arapahoverbs.lexc
LEXICON AINaffInflection
@U.PERNUM.1SGSAI@[1SG-SUBJ]:@U.PERNUM.1SGSAI@^		#;
@U.PERNUM.1PLSAI@[1PL-SUBJ]:@U.PERNUM.1PLSAI@^be		#;
@U.PERNUM.12SAI@[1PL-INCL-SUBJ]:@U.PERNUM.12SAI@^n		#;
@U.PERNUM.2SGSAI@[2SG-SUBJ]:@U.PERNUM.2SGSAI@^		#;
@U.PERNUM.2PLSAI@[2PL-SUBJ]:@U.PERNUM.2PLSAI@^be		#;
@U.PERNUM.3SGSAI@[3SG-SUBJ]:@U.PERNUM.3SGSAI@^		#;
@U.PERNUM.3PLSAI@[3PL-SUBJ]:@U.PERNUM.3PLSAI@^no'		#;
@U.PERNUM.4SGSAI@[4SG-SUBJ]:@U.PERNUM.4SGSAI@^n		#;
@U.PERNUM.4PLSAI@[4PL-SUBJ]:@U.PERNUM.4PLSAI@^nino		#;

LEXICON AIImpInflection
[2SG-SUBJ]:^		#;
[2PL-SUBJ]:^'		#;


LEXICON TIAffInflection
[1SG-SUBJ]:^owoo		#;
[1PL-SUBJ]:^owu'		#;
[1PL-SUBJ]:^owuni'		#;
[1PL-INCL-SUBJ]:^owuno'		#;
[2SG-SUBJ]:^ow		#;
[2PL-SUBJ]:^owunee		#;
[3SG-SUBJ]:^o'		#;
[3PL-SUBJ]:^ou'u		#;
[4SG-SUBJ]:^owuni3		#;
[4PL-SUBJ]:^owuni3i		#;

LEXICON TINaffInflection
@U.PERNUM.1SGTI@[1SG-SUBJ]:@U.PERNUM.1SGTI@^		#;
@U.PERNUM.1PLTI@[1PL-SUBJ]:@U.PERNUM.1PLTI@^owube		#;
@U.PERNUM.1PLTI@[1PL-SUBJ]:@U.PERNUM.1PLTI@^eebe		#;
@U.PERNUM.12TI@[1PL-INCL-SUBJ]:@U.PERNUM.12TI@^ow		#;
@U.PERNUM.2SGTI@[2SG-SUBJ]:@U.PERNUM.2SGTI@^		#;
@U.PERNUM.2PLTI@[2PL-SUBJ]:@U.PERNUM.2PLTI@^owube		#;
@U.PERNUM.2PLTI@[2PL-SUBJ]:@U.PERNUM.2PLTI@^eebe		#;
@U.PERNUM.3SGTI@[3SG-SUBJ]:@U.PERNUM.3SGTI@^		#;
@U.PERNUM.3PLTI@[3PL-SUBJ]:@U.PERNUM.3PLTI@^owuu		#;
@U.PERNUM.4SGTI@[4SG-SUBJ]:@U.PERNUM.4SGTI@^owun		#;
@U.PERNUM.4PLTI@[4PL-SUBJ]:@U.PERNUM.4PLTI@^owunino		#;

LEXICON TIImpInflection
@U.IMP.IMPERATIVE@[2SG-SUBJ]:@U.IMP.IMPERATIVE@^oo		#;
@U.IMP.IMPERATIVE@[2PL-SUBJ]:@U.IMP.IMPERATIVE@^owu'		#;
@U.IMP.PROHIBITIVE@[2SG-SUBJ]:@U.IMP.PROHIBITIVE@		#;
@U.IMP.PROHIBITIVE@[2PL-SUBJ]:@U.IMP.PROHIBITIVE@^owu'		#;


LEXICON TAAffInflection
[1SG-SUBJ][2SG-OBJ]:e3en		#;
[1SG-SUBJ][2PL-OBJ]:^e3enee		#;
[2SG-SUBJ][1SG-OBJ]:^in		#;
[2PL-SUBJ][1SG-OBJ]:^inee		#;
[1PL-EXCL-SUBJ][2SG-OBJ]:^een		#;
[1PL-EXCL-SUBJ][2PL-OBJ]:^eenee		#;
[2SG-SUBJ][1PL-EXCL-OBJ]:^ei'een		#;
[2PL-SUBJ][1PL-EXCL-OBJ]:^ei'eenee		#;
[1SG-SUBJ][3SG-OBJ]:^o'		#;
[1SG-SUBJ][3PL-OBJ]:^ou'u		#;
[2SG-SUBJ][3SG-OBJ]:^ot		#;
[2SG-SUBJ][3PL-OBJ]:^oti		#;
[3SG-SUBJ][4SG-OBJ]:^oot		#;
[3SG-SUBJ][4PL-OBJ]:^oot		#;
[4SG-SUBJ][4SG-OBJ]:^ooni3		#;
[4SG-SUBJ][4PL-OBJ]:^ooni3		#;
[1PL-EXCL-SUBJ][3SG-OBJ]:^eet		#;
[1PL-EXCL-SUBJ][3PL-OBJ]:^ee3i'		#;
[1PL-INCL-SUBJ][3SG-OBJ]:^oono'		#;
[1PL-INCL-SUBJ][3PL-OBJ]:^oono'		#;
[2PL-SUBJ][3SG-OBJ]:^oonee		#;
[2PL-SUBJ][3PL-OBJ]:^oonee		#;
!!! changed !!!
![3PL-SUBJ][3SG-OBJ]:^oo3i'		#;
[3PL-SUBJ][4SG-OBJ]:^oo3i'		#;
![3PL-SUBJ][3PL-OBJ]:^oo3i'		#;
[3PL-SUBJ][4PL-OBJ]:^oo3i'		#;
[4PL-SUBJ][4SG-OBJ]:^ooni3i		#;
[4PL-SUBJ][4PL-OBJ]:^ooni3i		#;
[3SG-SUBJ][1SG-OBJ]:^einoo		#;
[3PL-SUBJ][1SG-OBJ]:^i3i'		#;
[3SG-SUBJ][2SG-OBJ]:^ein		#;
[3PL-SUBJ][2SG-OBJ]:^einoni		#;
[4SG-SUBJ][3SG-OBJ]:^eit		#;
[4PL-SUBJ][3SG-OBJ]:^eit		#;
[4SG-SUBJ][4SG-OBJ]:^eini3		#;
[4PL-SUBJ][4SG-OBJ]:^eini3		#;
[3SG-SUBJ][1PL-EXCL-OBJ]:^ei'eet		#;
[3PL-SUBJ][1PL-EXCL-OBJ]:^ei'ee3i'		#;
[3SG-SUBJ][1PL-INCL-OBJ]:^eino'		#;
[3PL-SUBJ][1PL-INCL-OBJ]:^eino'		#;
[3SG-SUBJ][2PL-OBJ]:^einee		#;
[3PL-SUBJ][2PL-OBJ]:^einee		#;
[4SG-SUBJ][3PL-OBJ]:^ei3i'		#;
[4PL-SUBJ][3PL-OBJ]:^ei3i'		#;
[4SG-SUBJ][4PL-OBJ]:^eini3i		#;
[4PL-SUBJ][4PL-OBJ]:^eini3i		#;

LEXICON TANaffInflection
@U.PERNUM.1S2S@[1SG-SUBJ][2SG-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.1S2S@^e3		#;
@U.PERNUM.1S2PL@[1SG-SUBJ][2PL-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.1S2PL@^e3ebe		#;
@U.PERNUM.2S1S@[2SG-SUBJ][1SG-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.2S1S@		#;
@U.PERNUM.2PL1S@[2PL-SUBJ][1SG-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.2PL1S@^ibe		#;
@U.PERNUM.1PL2S@[1PL-EXCL-SUBJ][2SG-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.1PL2S@^ee		#;
@U.PERNUM.1PL2PL@[1PL-EXCL-SUBJ][2PL-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.1PL2PL@^eebe		#;
@U.PERNUM.2S1PL@[2SG-SUBJ][1PL-EXCL-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.2S1PL@^ei'ee		#;
@U.PERNUM.2PL1PL@[2PL-SUBJ][1PL-EXCL-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.2PL1PL@^ei'eebe		#;
@U.PERNUM.1S3S@[1SG-SUBJ][3SG-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.1S3S@^oo		#;
@U.PERNUM.1S3PL@[1SG-SUBJ][3PL-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.1S3PL@^oono'		#;
@U.PERNUM.2S3S@[2SG-SUBJ][3SG-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.2S3S@^oo		#;
@U.PERNUM.2S3PL@[2SG-SUBJ][3PL-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.2S3PL@^oono'		#;
@U.PERNUM.3S4S@[3SG-SUBJ][4SG-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.3S4S@^ee		#;
@U.PERNUM.3S4PL@[3SG-SUBJ][4PL-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.3S4PL@^ee		#;
@U.PERNUM.4S4S@[4SG-SUBJ][4SG-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.4S4S@^een		#;
@U.PERNUM.4S4PL@[4SG-SUBJ][4PL-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.4S4PL@^een		#;
@U.PERNUM.1PL3S@[1PL-EXCL-SUBJ][3SG-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.1PL3S@^oobe		#;
@U.PERNUM.1PL3PL@[1PL-EXCL-SUBJ][3PL-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.1PL3PL@^oobe		#;
@U.PERNUM.123S@[1PL-INCL-SUBJ][3SG-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.123S@^oon		#;
@U.PERNUM.123PL@[1PL-INCL-SUBJ][3PL-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.123PL@^oon		#;
@U.PERNUM.2PL3S@[2PL-SUBJ][3SG-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.2PL3S@^oobe		#;
@U.PERNUM.2PL3PL@[2PL-SUBJ][3PL-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.2PL3PL@^oobe		#;
@U.PERNUM.3PL4S@[3PL-SUBJ][4SG-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.3PL4S@^eeno'		#;
@U.PERNUM.3PL4PL@[3PL-SUBJ][4PL-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.3PL4PL@^eeno'		#;
@U.PERNUM.4PL4S@[4PL-SUBJ][4SG-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.4PL4S@^eenino		#;
@U.PERNUM.4PL4PL@[4PL-SUBJ][4PL-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.4PL4PL@^eenino		#;
@U.PERNUM.3S1S@[3SG-SUBJ][1SG-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.3S1S@^e'		#;
@U.PERNUM.3PL1S@[3PL-SUBJ][1SG-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.3PL1S@^ei'i		#;
@U.PERNUM.3S2S@[3SG-SUBJ][2SG-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.3S2S@^e'		#;
@U.PERNUM.3PL2S@[3PL-SUBJ][2SG-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.3PL2S@^ei'i		#;
@U.PERNUM.4S3S@[4SG-SUBJ][3SG-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.4S3S@^e'		#;
@U.PERNUM.4PL3S@[4PL-SUBJ][3SG-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.4PL3S@^e'		#;
@U.PERNUM.4S4S@[4SG-SUBJ][4SG-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.4S4S@^e'		#;
@U.PERNUM.4S4PL@[4SG-SUBJ][4PL-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.4S4PL@^e'		#;
@U.PERNUM.3S1PL@[3SG-SUBJ][1PL-EXCL-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.3S1PL@^eibe		#;
@U.PERNUM.3PL1PL@[3PL-SUBJ][1PL-EXCL-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.3PL1PL@^eibe		#;
@U.PERNUM.3S12@[3SG-SUBJ][1PL-INCL-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.3S12@^ein		#;
@U.PERNUM.3PL12@[3PL-SUBJ][1PL-INCL-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.3PL12@^ein		#;
@U.PERNUM.3S2PL@[3SG-SUBJ][2PL-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.3S2PL@^eibe		#;
@U.PERNUM.3PL2PL@[3PL-SUBJ][2PL-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.3PL2PL@^eibe		#;
@U.PERNUM.4S3PL@[4SG-SUBJ][3PL-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.4S3PL@^ei'i		#;
@U.PERNUM.4PL3PL@[4PL-SUBJ][3PL-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.4PL3PL@^ei'i		#;
@U.PERNUM.4S4PL@[4SG-SUBJ][4PL-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.4S4PL@^ei'i		#;
@U.PERNUM.4PL4PL@[4PL-SUBJ][4PL-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.4PL4PL@^ei'i		#;

LEXICON TAImpInflection
@U.PERNUM.2S1S@[2SG-SUBJ][1SG-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.2S1S@^i		#;
@U.PERNUM.2PL1S@[2PL-SUBJ][1SG-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.2PL1S@^i'		#;
@U.PERNUM.2S1PL@[2SG-SUBJ][1PL-EXCL-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.2S1PL@^ei'ee		#;
@U.PERNUM.2PL1PL@[2PL-SUBJ][1PL-EXCL-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.2PL1PL@^ei'ee'		#;
@U.PERNUM.2S3S@[2SG-SUBJ][3SG-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.2S3S@^in		#;
@U.PERNUM.2S3PL@[2SG-SUBJ][3PL-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.2S3PL@^in		#;
@U.PERNUM.2PL3S@[2PL-SUBJ][3SG-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.2PL3S@^e'		#;
@U.PERNUM.2PL3PL@[2PL-SUBJ][3PL-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.2PL3PL@^e'		#;
